District of Columbia statutes.
26-131.05

Evaluation of automated teller machine safety.

(a)

An operator of, or person controlling, an automated teller machine shall adopt procedures for evaluating the safety of an automated teller machine. The procedures shall include a consideration of the following:

(1)

The extent to which the lighting for the automated teller machine complies, or will comply, with the standards required by this chapter;

(2)

The presence of obstructions, including landscaping and vegetation, in the area of the automated teller machine, the access area, and the defined parking area; and

(3)

The incidence of crimes of violence in the immediate neighborhood of the automated teller machine, as reflected in the records of the local law enforcement agency.

(b)

This chapter shall not impose a duty to relocate or modify an automated teller machine upon the occurrence of a particular event or circumstance.

History

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 505, 48 DCR 3244